Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 1

Limited Guardianship Proceedings [Repealed]

34-4-101 — 34-4-116.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§34-4-101 —34-4-116 (Acts 1979, ch. 366, §§ 1-10; 1980, ch. 499, § 1; 1981, ch. 369, §§ 2-12, 14; 1982, ch. 795, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. §§ 34-1201 — 34-1210,34-12-101 —34-12-110,34-12-113 —34-12-118), concerning limited guardianship proceedings, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, §§ 50, effective January 1, 1993. For new law concerning guardianship and conservatorship, see chs. 1-3 of this title.

Acts 1996, ch. 811, § 2 purported to amend §34-4-102.